Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-703
Right to the exercise of religion; operation of a religious organization during a state of emergency; restrictions on state action.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, state action shall not:

(1) Substantially burden a person's right to the exercise of religion unless it is demonstrated that applying the burden to that person's exercise of religion in this particular instance is essential to further a compelling governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest; or

(2) Restrict a religious organization from operating and engaging in religious services during a state of emergency to a greater extent than the state restricts other organizations or businesses from operating during a state of emergency.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 3.